Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.200

Faculty—Composition—General powers.

The faculty of the University of Washington shall consist of the president of the university and the professors and the said faculty shall have charge of the immediate government of the institution under such rules as may be prescribed by the board of regents.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.200. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 241 s 6; RRS s 4558; prior: 1897 c 118 s 187. Formerly RCW 28.77.120.]